Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB111.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 257 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the determination and implementation of any
on-farm animal health care or animal health production practice shall be made solely by a farmer or owner
of the livestock or poultry. A farmer or owner of the livestock or poultry may consult with a veterinarian as
defined in KRS 321.181 or any other professional at his or her discretion.
(2) This section shall not apply to any owner of an equine or any equine operation.
(3) This section shall not be construed to limit, preclude, or otherwise restrict any state or federal official from
carrying out his or her official duties.
Signed by Governor April 3, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version